Louisiana, session 2026, HB1111.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:2490(E) and (F) and 2550(E) and (F) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§2490. Reinstatement and reemployment
* * *
E.(1) Subject to the requirements of this Subsection, any regular employee
who resigns or retires is separated from service as specified in Paragraph (3) of this
Subsection from a position in the classified service and who applies for
reemployment shall be reemployed in a position of the class in which he was
employed immediately preceding his resignation or retirement separation. The
determination of whether a separation from service is the result of an injury or
medical condition arising out of and in the course and scope of employment, or is
non-duty-related, shall be made by the employee's treating physician. However, if
Page 1 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2647 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1111
there are no available positions in his former class, he may be temporarily placed
shall have the option to remain on an active reemployment eligibility list for the
former class until such position becomes available or accept temporary placement
in a position in any lower class. If the employee is temporarily placed in a position
in a lower class, he shall receive the same rate of pay, including longevity pay, that
he would have otherwise received for the position in which he was to be reemployed
in his former class. In addition, during his temporary placement, he shall be placed
first on the eligibility list for a position in his former class and shall not be required
to retest for any such position. During any period of temporary placement or while
remaining on an active reemployment eligibility list, the employee shall be placed
first on the eligibility list for a position in his former class and shall not be required
to retest. The employee shall remain first on such list until he is appointed to a
position in his former class.
(2)(a) Prior to reemployment, an employee shall give notice to the
appointing authority that the employee is able to return to work. An authorization
from the employee's treating physician certifying that the employee is able to
perform the essential functions of the position that were required at the time he was
originally confirmed in such position shall be included with the employee's notice
to the appointing authority. Upon furnishing such notice and certification to the
appointing authority, the employee shall be deemed qualified for the position. The
board shall approve the reemployment of the employee and the appointing authority
shall reemploy such employee. The employee shall be considered a permanent
employee and shall not be required to serve a working test. In addition, the
employee shall be reemployed with the departmental and promotional seniority the
employee accrued during his employment including any such seniority that he would
have accumulated from the date of his separation through the date of reinstatement
as if he remained in continuous service. The employee shall retain longevity, salary
step placement, and pay progression status. The employee shall receive all benefits,
rights, and privileges equal to those of similarly situated employees of the same rank,
Page 2 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2647 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1111
classification, tenure, longevity, and seniority who remained continuously
employed.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph,
if the appointing authority board has a specific cause to dispute the certification of
the employee's treating physician, the appointing authority board may have the
employee evaluated by another physician for the limited purpose of confirming that
the injury or medical condition that resulted in his resignation or retirement
separation from service no longer prevents him from performing the essential
functions of the position. If there is a disagreement between the employee's treating
physician and the physician selected by the appointing authority board, the two
physicians shall select a third physician whose opinion shall be determinative. The
physician selected by the board shall be independent and shall not be regularly
retained by the appointing authority.
(3) The reemployment provided for in this Subsection applies only if a
resignation or retirement occurred as a result of the employee's being unable to
perform the essential functions of his job after sustaining an injury or developing a
medical condition during the course and scope of his employment as determined by
the employee's treating physician shall apply to any employee who is separated from
service and who previously sustained an injury or developed a medical condition
arising out of and in the course and scope of employment, which condition resulted
in the employee being unable to perform the essential functions of the position,
whether such inability was temporary or permanent, as determined by the employee's
treating physician, and who is subsequently able to perform the essential functions
of the position. Eligibility for reemployment under this Subsection shall be
determined solely upon the existence of such job-related injury or medical condition,
the resulting inability to perform the essential functions of the position, and the
employee's current medical ability to perform those functions, and shall not be
affected by the form, manner, cause, timing, or procedural classification of the
employee's separation from service. In addition, the reemployment provided for in
Page 3 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2647 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1111
this Subsection is available at any time after the resignation or retirement of the
employee separation from service.
F.(1) Subject to the requirements of this Subsection, any regular employee
who retires is separated from service from a position in the classified fire service as
a result of an injury or a medical condition which prevents him from performing the
essential functions of his job and who previously sustained an injury or developed
a medical condition which prevents or prevented him from performing the essential
functions of his job as determined by the employee's treating physician, and who
applies for reemployment shall be reemployed in a position of the class in which he
was employed immediately preceding his retirement separation. Eligibility for
reemployment under this Subsection shall not be affected by the form, manner,
cause, timing, or procedural classification of the employee's separation from service.
However, if there are no available positions in his former class, he may be
temporarily placed shall have the option to remain on an active reemployment
eligibility list for the former class until such position becomes available or accept
temporary placement in a position in any lower class. If the employee is temporarily
placed in a position in a lower class, he shall receive the same rate of pay, including
longevity pay, that he would have otherwise received for the position in which he
was to be reemployed in his former class. In addition, during his temporary
placement, he shall be placed first on the eligibility list for a position in his former
class and shall not be required to retest for any such position. During any period of
temporary placement or while remaining on an active reemployment eligibility list,
the employee shall be placed first on the eligibility list for a position in his former
class and shall not be required to retest. The employee shall remain first on such list
until he is appointed to a position in his former class. The determination of whether
a separation from service is duty-related or non-duty-related shall be made by the
employee's treating physician.
(2)(a) Prior to reemployment, an employee shall give notice to the
appointing authority that the employee is able to return to work. An authorization
Page 4 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2647 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1111
from the employee's treating physician certifying that the employee is able to
perform the essential functions of the position that were required at the time he was
originally confirmed in such position shall be included with the employee's notice
to the appointing authority. Upon furnishing such notice and certification to the
appointing authority, the employee shall be deemed qualified for the position. The
board shall approve the reemployment of the employee and the appointing authority
shall reemploy such employee. The employee shall be considered a permanent
employee and shall not be required to serve a working test. In addition, the
employee shall be reemployed with the departmental and promotional seniority the
employee had accrued as of the date of his retirement separation. The employee
shall retain longevity, salary step placement, and pay progression status as they
existed at the time of separation. The employee shall receive all benefits, rights, and
privileges equal to those of similarly situated employees of the same rank,
classification, tenure, longevity, and seniority.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph,
if the appointing authority board has a specific cause to dispute the certification of
the employee's treating physician, the appointing authority board may have the
employee evaluated by another physician for the limited purpose of confirming that
the injury or medical condition that resulted in his retirement separation no longer
prevents him from performing the essential functions of the position. If there is a
disagreement between the employee's treating physician and the physician selected
by the appointing authority board, the two physicians shall select a third physician
whose opinion shall be determinative. The physician selected by the board shall be
independent and shall not be regularly retained by the appointing authority.
(3) The reemployment provided for in this Subsection is available at any
time after the retirement separation of service of the employee.
* * *
§2550. Reinstatement and reemployment
* * *
Page 5 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2647 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1111
E.(1) Subject to the requirements of this Subsection, any regular employee
who resigns or retires is separated from service as specified in Paragraph (3) of this
Subsection from a position in the classified service and who applies for
reemployment shall be reemployed in a position of the class in which he was
employed immediately preceding his resignation or retirement separation. The
determination of whether a separation from service is the result of an injury or
medical condition arising out of and in the course and scope of employment, or is
non-duty-related, shall be made by the employee's treating physician. However, if
there are no available positions in his former class, he may be temporarily placed
shall have the option to remain on an active reemployment eligibility list for the
former class until such position becomes available or accept temporary placement
in a position in any lower class. If the employee is temporarily placed in a position
in a lower class, he shall receive the same rate of pay, including longevity pay, that
he would have otherwise received for the position in which he was to be reemployed
in his former class. In addition, during his temporary placement, he shall be placed
first on the eligibility list for a position in his former class and shall not be required
to retest for any such position. During any period of temporary placement or while
remaining on an active reemployment eligibility list, the employee shall be placed
first on the eligibility list for a position in his former class and shall not be required
to retest. The employee shall remain first on such list until he is appointed to a
position in his former class.
(2)(a) Prior to reemployment, an employee shall give notice to the
appointing authority that the employee is able to return to work. An authorization
from the employee's treating physician certifying that the employee is able to
perform the essential functions of the position that were required at the time he was
originally confirmed in such position shall be included with the employee's notice
to the appointing authority. Upon furnishing such notice and certification to the
appointing authority, the employee shall be deemed qualified for the position. The
board shall approve the reemployment of the employee and the appointing authority
Page 6 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2647 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1111
shall reemploy such employee. The employee shall be considered a permanent
employee and shall not be required to serve a working test. In addition, the
employee shall be reemployed with the departmental and promotional seniority the
employee accrued during his employment including any such seniority that he would
have accumulated from the date of his separation through the date of reinstatement
as if he remained in continuous service. The employee shall retain longevity, salary
step placement, and pay progression status. The employee shall receive all benefits,
rights, and privileges equal to those of similarly situated employees of the same rank,
classification, tenure, longevity, and seniority who remained continuously employed.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph,
if the appointing authority board has a specific cause to dispute the certification of
the employee's treating physician, the appointing authority board may have the
employee evaluated by another physician for the limited purpose of confirming that
the injury or medical condition that resulted in his resignation or retirement
separation from service no longer prevents him from performing the essential
functions of the position. If there is a disagreement between the employee's treating
physician and the physician selected by the appointing authority board, the two
physicians shall select a third physician whose opinion shall be determinative. The
physician selected by the board shall be independent and shall not be regularly
retained by the appointing authority.
(3) The reemployment provided for in this Subsection applies only if a
resignation or retirement occurred as a result of the employee's being unable to
perform the essential functions of his job after sustaining an injury or developing a
medical condition during the course and scope of his employment as determined by
the employee's treating physician shall apply to any employee who is separated from
service and who previously sustained an injury or developed a medical condition
arising out of and in the course and scope of employment, which condition resulted
in the employee being unable to perform the essential functions of the position,
whether such inability was temporary or permanent, as determined by the employee's
Page 7 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2647 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1111
treating physician, and who is subsequently able to perform the essential functions
of the position. Eligibility for reemployment under this Subsection shall be
determined solely upon the existence of such job-related injury or medical condition,
the resulting inability to perform the essential functions of the position, and the
employee's current medical ability to perform those functions, and shall not be
affected by the form, manner, cause, timing, or procedural classification of the
employee's separation from service. In addition, the reemployment provided for in
this Subsection is available at any time after the resignation or retirement of the
employee separation from service.
F.(1) Subject to the requirements of this Subsection, any regular employee
who retires is separated from service from a position in the classified fire service as
a result of an injury or a medical condition which prevents him from performing the
essential functions of his job and who previously sustained an injury or developed
a medical condition which prevents or prevented him from performing the essential
functions of his job as determined by the employee's treating physician, and who
applies for reemployment shall be reemployed in a position of the class in which he
was employed immediately preceding his retirement separation. Eligibility for
reemployment under this Subsection shall not be affected by the form, manner,
cause, timing, or procedural classification of the employee's separation from service.
However, if there are no available positions in his former class, he may be
temporarily placed shall have the option to remain on an active reemployment
eligibility list for the former class until such position becomes available or accept
temporary placement in a position in any lower class. If the employee is temporarily
placed in a position in a lower class, he shall receive the same rate of pay, including
longevity pay, that he would have otherwise received for the position in which he
was to be reemployed in his former class. In addition, during his temporary
placement, he shall be placed first on the eligibility list for a position in his former
class and shall not be required to retest for any such position. During any period of
temporary placement or while remaining on an active reemployment eligibility list,
Page 8 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2647 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1111
the employee shall be placed first on the eligibility list for a position in his former
class and shall not be required to retest. The employee shall remain first on such list
until he is appointed to a position in his former class. The determination of whether
a separation from service is duty-related or non-duty-related shall be made by the
employee's treating physician.
(2)(a) Prior to reemployment, an employee shall give notice to the
appointing authority that the employee is able to return to work. An authorization
from the employee's treating physician certifying that the employee is able to
perform the essential functions of the position that were required at the time he was
originally confirmed in such position shall be included with the employee's notice
to the appointing authority. Upon furnishing such notice and certification to the
appointing authority, the employee shall be deemed qualified for the position. The
board shall approve the reemployment of the employee and the appointing authority
shall reemploy such employee. The employee shall be considered a permanent
employee and shall not be required to serve a working test. In addition, the
employee shall be reemployed with the departmental and promotional seniority the
employee had accrued as of the date of his retirement separation. The employee
shall retain longevity, salary step placement, and pay progression status as they
existed at the time of separation. The employee shall receive all benefits, rights, and
privileges equal to those of similarly situated employees of the same rank,
classification, tenure, longevity, and seniority.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph,
if the appointing authority board has a specific cause to dispute the certification of
the employee's treating physician, the appointing authority board may have the
employee evaluated by another physician for the limited purpose of confirming that
the injury or medical condition that resulted in his retirement separation from service
no longer prevents him from performing the essential functions of the position. If
there is a disagreement between the employee's treating physician and the physician
selected by the appointing authority board, the two physicians shall select a third
Page 9 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2647 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1111
physician whose opinion shall be determinative. The physician selected by the board
shall be independent and shall not be regularly retained by the appointing authority.
(3) The reemployment provided for in this Subsection is available at any
time after the retirement separation of service of the employee.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.